Montana, session 2025, HB433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Deprivation of right to keep and bear arms prohibited -- exceptions.
Except when a person is charged with committing a forcible felony as defined in 45-2-101 or charged with a
crime of violence using a weapon as defined in 45-2-101, a person may not be deprived, pending trial, of any
rights protected by Article II, section 12, of the Montana constitution or the second amendment to the United
States constitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, and the provisions of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 433